Washington statutes.
RCW 43.320.011

Department of general administration and department of licensing powers and duties transferred.

(1) All powers, duties, and functions of the *department of general administration under Titles **30, 31, 32, 33, and 43 RCW and any other title pertaining to duties relating to banks, savings banks, foreign bank branches, savings and loan associations, credit unions, consumer loan companies, check cashers and sellers, trust companies and departments, and other similar institutions are transferred to the department of financial institutions. All references to the *director of general administration, supervisor of banking, or the supervisor of savings and loan associations in the Revised Code of Washington are construed to mean the director of the department of financial institutions when referring to the functions transferred in this section. All references to the *department of general administration in the Revised Code of Washington are construed to mean the department of financial institutions when referring to the functions transferred in this subsection.

(2) All powers, duties, and functions of the department of licensing under chapters 18.44, 19.100, 19.110, 21.20, 21.30, and 48.18A RCW and any other statute pertaining to the regulation under the chapters listed in this subsection of escrow agents, securities, franchises, business opportunities, commodities, and any other speculative investments are transferred to the department of financial institutions. All references to the director or department of licensing in the Revised Code of Washington are construed to mean the director or department of financial institutions when referring to the functions transferred in this subsection.

[ 1995 c 238 s 6; 1993 c 472 s 6.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) The "department of general administration" and the "director of general administration" were renamed the "department of enterprise services" and the "director of enterprise services" by 2011 1st sp.s. c 43.

**(2) Title 30 RCW was recodified and/or repealed pursuant to 2014 c 37, effective January 5, 2015.

Effective date—1995 c 238: See note following RCW 18.44.011.